Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.140

Periodic examinations—Persons with developmental disability—Reports—Notice to court.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

(1) Each person committed to a hospital or other facility or conditionally released pursuant to this chapter shall have a current examination of his or her mental condition made by one or more experts or professional persons at least once every six months. The person may retain, or if the person is indigent and so requests, the court shall assist the person in obtaining a qualified expert or professional person to examine him or her, and such expert or professional person shall have access to all hospital records concerning the person. An expert or professional person obtained by an indigent person who is committed to state psychiatric care following acquittal by reason of insanity shall be compensated out of funds of the office of public defense as provided in policies and procedures under chapter 2.70 RCW, in a manner consistent with the rules of professional conduct and the standards for indigent defense.

(2) In the case of a committed or conditionally released person who has a developmental disability, the expert shall be a developmental disabilities professional. The secretary, upon receipt of the periodic report, shall provide written notice to the court of commitment of compliance with the requirements of this section.

[ 2023 c 120 s 7; 1998 c 297 s 40; 1989 c 420 s 8; 1974 ex.s. c 198 s 12; 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 14.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2023 c 120: See notes following RCW 2.70.027.

Effective dates—Severability—Intent—1998 c 297: See notes following RCW 71.05.010.